Washington statutes.
RCW 43.92.060

Cooperation with federal geological survey.

The state geologist may make provisions for topographic, geologic, and hydrographic surveys of the state in cooperation with the United States geological survey in such manner as in the opinion of the state geologist will be of the greatest benefit to the agricultural, industrial, and geological requirements of the state. However, the director of the United States geological survey must first agree to expend on the part of the United States upon such surveys a sum equal to that expended by the state.

[ 2006 c 340 s 6; 1965 c 8 s 43.92.060. Prior: 1903 c 157 s 1; 1901 c 165 s 6; RRS s 5998.]